Illinois, session 104th, HB1237.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Native name, logo, or mascot.8    (a) As used in this Section, "native name, logo, or 9mascot" means the following:10        (1) a team name, including:11            (A) the name of a federally recognized tribe;12            (B) a historical Native American person or tribal 13        group; or14            (C) Redskins, Braves, Chiefs, Chieftains, Tribe, 15        Indians, or any synonymous term; or16        (2) a logo or mascot depicting the following:17            (A) Native Americans;18            (B) a feathered headdress;19            (C) a tomahawk;20            (D) an arrowhead; or21            (E) a spear, arrow, or other weapon if in 22        combination with a feather or feathers.23    (b) A school board shall prohibit a school from using a   HB1237 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1native name, logo, or mascot, except as provided in 2subsections (c) and (e).3    (c) A school may continue to use uniforms or other 4materials bearing a native name, logo, or mascot that were 5purchased on or before the effective date of this amendatory 6Act of the 104th General Assembly until September 1, 2030 if 7the school selects or sets forth a reasonable timeline for the 8selection of a new school or athletic team name, logo, or 9mascot that does not violate the prohibition under subsection 10(b) through formal school board action no later than July 1, 112026. Except as provided in subsection (e), the school may not 12purchase, acquire, or use resources for uniforms or other 13materials that include or bear the prohibited school or 14athletic team name, logo, or mascot after the effective date 15of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.16    (d) Except as provided in subsection (e), if a school 17facility, marquee, sign, or other permanent school structure 18bears the prohibited school or athletic team name, logo, or 19mascot, the school shall remove the prohibited name, logo, or 20mascot no later than the next time that part of the school 21facility, marquee, sign, or other permanent school structure 22where the name, logo, or mascot is located is remodeled or 23replaced in the normal course of maintenance. The school may 24not purchase or construct a school facility, marquee, sign, 25permanent school structure or other new or replacement fixture 26that includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team   HB1237 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1name, logo, or mascot after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.3    (e) For any school whose team name is the name of a 4federally recognized tribe or historical Native American 5person, the school may continue to use its current team name 6and an agreed upon logo and mascot on and after the effective 7date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly if 8all of the following conditions are met:9        (1) Written consent must be obtained from the elected 10    legislative body of the same federally recognized tribe as 11    the team name or the federally recognized tribe from which 12    the historical Native American person was a member, 13    indicating support for the name, logo, and mascot.14        (2) The written consent shall include a description of 15    the partnership with the federally recognized tribe to 16    provide deep, meaningful, and substantive learning 17    opportunities, as well as school policies that ensure 18    blatant, stereotypical, Native American names, slurs, 19    imagery, or caricatures or fake Native American behaviors 20    are not allowed in learning environments.21        (3) The school may not offer or accept any money, 22    consideration, or thing of value in exchange for the 23    written consent. Nothing in this paragraph (3) prohibits a 24    school district from reimbursing a member of a federally 25    recognized tribe for the reasonable costs of travel 26    expenses incurred for the purpose of providing meaningful   HB1237 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1    educational programming or learning opportunities for the 2    school district.3        (4) The written consent must be renewed every 5 years. 4    The federally recognized tribe shall have the right and 5    ability to revoke the written consent at any time at its 6    discretion. If either party wishes to terminate the 7    consent, the school shall select a new school or athletic 8    team name, logo, or mascot that does not violate the 9    prohibition under subsection (b) through formal school 10    board action no later than one year from the date of 11    termination and shall discontinue its use of the native 12    name, logo, or mascot no later than 3 years from the date 13    of termination. If a school facility, marquee, sign, or 14    other permanent school structure bears the prohibited 15    school or athletic team name, logo, or mascot, the school 16    shall remove the prohibited name, logo, or mascot no later 17    than the next time that part of the school facility, 18    marquee, sign, or other permanent school structure where 19    the name, logo, or mascot is located is remodeled or 20    replaced in the normal course of maintenance. The school 21    may not purchase or construct a school facility, marquee, 22    sign, permanent school structure, or other new or 23    replacement fixture that includes or bears the prohibited 24    school or athletic team name, logo, or mascot after the 25    date of termination.26    (f) Nothing in this Section may be interpreted to prohibit   HB1237 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1the use of native names as the name of a county, municipality, 2school district, or school.  3    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)4    Sec. 34-18.88. Native name, logo, or mascot.5    (a) As used in this Section, "native name, logo, or 6mascot" means the following:7        (1) a team name, including:8            (A) the name of a federally recognized tribe;9            (B) a historical Native American person or tribal 10        group; or11            (C) Redskins, Braves, Chiefs, Chieftains, Tribe, 12        Indians, or any synonymous term; or13        (2) a logo or mascot depicting the following:14            (A) Native Americans;15            (B) a feathered headdress;16            (C) a tomahawk;17            (D) an arrowhead; or18            (E) a spear, arrow, or other weapon if in 19        combination with a feather or feathers.20    (b) A board shall prohibit a school from using a native 21name, logo, or mascot, except as provided in subsections (c) 22and (e).23    (c) A school may continue to use uniforms or other 24materials bearing a native name, logo, or mascot that were 25purchased on or before the effective date of this amendatory   HB1237 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly until September 1, 2030 if 2the school selects or sets forth a reasonable timeline for the 3selection of a new school or athletic team name, logo, or 4mascot that does not violate the prohibition under subsection 5(b) through formal board action no later than July 1, 2026. 6Except as provided in subsection (e), the school may not 7purchase, acquire, or use resources for uniforms or other 8materials that include or bear the prohibited school or 9athletic team name, logo, or mascot after the effective date 10of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.11    (d) Except as provided in subsection (e), if a school 12facility, marquee, sign, or other permanent school structure 13bears the prohibited school or athletic team name, logo, or 14mascot, the school shall remove the prohibited name, logo, or 15mascot no later than the next time that part of the school 16facility, marquee, sign, or other permanent school structure 17where the name, logo, or mascot is located is remodeled or 18replaced in the normal course of maintenance. The school may 19not purchase or construct a school facility, marquee, sign, 20permanent school structure or other new or replacement fixture 21that includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team 22name, logo, or mascot after the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.24    (e) For any school whose team name is the name of a 25federally recognized tribe or historical Native American 26person, the school may continue to use its current team name   HB1237 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1and an agreed upon logo and mascot on and after the effective 2date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly if 3all of the following conditions are met:4        (1) Written consent must be obtained from the elected 5    legislative body of the same federally recognized tribe as 6    the team name or the federally recognized tribe from which 7    the historical Native American person was a member, 8    indicating support for the name, logo, and mascot.9        (2) The written consent shall include a description of 10    the partnership with the federally recognized tribe to 11    provide deep, meaningful, and substantive learning 12    opportunities, as well as school policies that ensure 13    blatant, stereotypical, Native American names, slurs, 14    imagery, or caricatures or fake Native American behaviors 15    are not allowed in learning environments.16        (3) The school may not offer or accept any money, 17    consideration, or thing of value in exchange for the 18    written consent. Nothing in this paragraph (3) prohibits a 19    school district from reimbursing a member of a federally 20    recognized tribe for the reasonable costs of travel 21    expenses incurred for the purpose of providing meaningful 22    educational programming or learning opportunities for the 23    school district.24        (4) The written consent must be renewed every 5 years. 25    The federally recognized tribe shall have the right and 26    ability to revoke the written consent at any time at its   HB1237 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 06188 LNS 16223 b1    discretion. If either party wishes to terminate the 2    consent, the school shall select a new school or athletic 3    team name, logo, or mascot that does not violate the 4    prohibition under subsection (b) through formal board 5    action no later than one year from the date of termination 6    and shall discontinue its use of the native name, logo, or 7    mascot no later than 3 years from the date of termination. 8    If a school facility, marquee, sign, or other permanent 9    school structure bears the prohibited school or athletic 10    team name, logo, or mascot, the school shall remove the 11    prohibited name, logo, or mascot no later than the next 12    time that part of the school facility, marquee, sign, or 13    other permanent school structure where the name, logo, or 14    mascot is located is remodeled or replaced in the normal 15    course of maintenance. The school may not purchase or 16    construct a school facility, marquee, sign, permanent 17    school structure, or other new or replacement fixture that 18    includes or bears the prohibited school or athletic team 19    name, logo, or mascot after the date of termination.20    (f) Nothing in this Section may be interpreted to prohibit 21the use of native names as the name of a county, municipality, 22school district, or school. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 242026.